Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Chapter 40. The Alaska Coastal Management Program.

Secs. 46.40.010 — 46.40.070.
Development of Alaska coastal management program. [Repealed, § 18 ch 31 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 46.40.080.
Effective date of Alaska coastal management program. [Repealed, § 44 ch 24 SLA 2003.]

Secs. 46.40.090 — 46.40.100.
Development of Alaska coastal management program. [Repealed, § 18 ch 31 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 46.40.110.
Coastal management plans in the unorganized borough. [Repealed, § 18 ch 31 SLA 2005.]

Secs. 46.40.120, 46.40.130.
Coastal resource service areas; organization of coastal resource service area. [Repealed, § 44 ch 24 SLA 2003.]

Secs. 46.40.140, 46.40.150.
Coastal management plans in the unorganized borough. [Repealed, § 18 ch 31 SLA 2005.]

Secs. 46.40.160, 46.40.170.
Organization at the direction of the council; preparation of district coastal management program by the Department of Community and Economic Development. [Repealed, § 44 ch 24 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 46.40.180.
Coastal management plans in the unorganized borough. [Repealed, § 18 ch 31 SLA 2005.]

Secs. 46.40.190, 46.40.195.
Cooperative administration; construction with other laws. [Repealed, § 18 ch 31 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 46.40.200.
State agencies. [Repealed, § 44 ch 24 SLA 2003.]

Secs. 46.40.205, 46.40.210.
Consistency determinations for certain activities involving nonconventional gas; definitions. [Repealed, § 18 ch 31 SLA 2005.]